Washington statutes.
RCW 43.143.050

Washington coastal marine advisory council.

(1) The Washington coastal marine advisory council is established in the executive office of the governor to fulfill the duties outlined in RCW 43.143.060.

(2)(a) Voting members of the Washington coastal marine advisory council shall be appointed by the governor or the governor's designee. The council consists of the following voting members:

(i) The governor or the governor's designee;

(ii) The director or commissioner, or the director's or commissioner's designee, of the following agencies:

(A) The department of ecology;

(B) The department of natural resources;

(C) The department of fish and wildlife;

(D) The state parks and recreation commission;

(E) The department of commerce; and

(F) Washington sea grant;

(iii) The following members of the Washington coastal marine advisory council established by the department of ecology and as existing on January 15, 2013:

(A) One citizen from a coastal community;

(B) Two persons representing coastal commercial fishing;

(C) One representative from a coastal conservation group;

(D) One representative from a coastal economic development group;

(E) One representative from an educational institution;

(F) Two representatives from energy industries or organizations, one of which must be from the coast;

(G) One person representing coastal recreation;

(H) One person representing coastal recreational fishing;

(I) One person representing coastal shellfish aquaculture;

(J) One representative from the coastal shipping industry;

(K) One representative from a science organization;

(L) One representative from the coastal Washington sustainable salmon partnership;

(M) One representative from a coastal port; and

(N) One representative from each outer coast marine resources committee, to be selected by the marine resources committee.

(b) The Washington coastal marine advisory council shall adopt bylaws and operating procedures that may be modified from time to time by the council.

(3) The Washington coastal marine advisory council may invite state, tribal, local governments, federal agencies, scientific experts, and others with responsibility for the study and management of coastal and ocean resources or regulation of coastal and ocean activities to designate a liaison to the council to attend council meetings, respond to council requests for technical and policy information, perform collaborative research, and review any draft materials prepared by the council. The council may also invite representatives from other coastal states or Canadian provinces to participate, when appropriate, as nonvoting members.

(4) The chair of the Washington coastal marine advisory council must be nominated and elected by a majority of councilmembers. The term of the chair is one year, and the position is eligible for reelection. The agenda for each meeting must be developed as a collaborative process by councilmembers.

(5) The term of office of each member appointed by the governor is four years. Members are eligible for reappointment.

(6) The Washington coastal marine advisory council shall utilize a consensus approach to decision making. The council may put a decision to a vote among councilmembers, in the event that consensus cannot be reached. The council must include in its bylaws guidelines describing how consensus works and when a lack of consensus among councilmembers will trigger a vote.

(7) Consistent with available resources, the Washington coastal marine advisory council may hire a neutral convener to assist in the performance of the council's duties, including but not limited to the dissemination of information to all parties, facilitating selected tasks as requested by the councilmembers, and facilitation of setting meeting agendas.

(8) The department of ecology shall provide administrative and primary staff support for the Washington coastal marine advisory council.

(9) The Washington coastal marine advisory council must meet at least twice each year or as needed.

(10) A majority of the members of the Washington coastal marine advisory council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

[ 2013 c 318 s 1.]